Ohio, session 136, SB85.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 4501.21 be amended and section 4
4503.589 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 5
Sec. 4501.21. (A) There is hereby created in the state 6
treasury the license plate contribution fund. The fund shall 7
consist of all contributions for specialty license plates paid 8
by motor vehicle registrants and collected by the registrar of 9
motor vehicles pursuant to the Revised Code sections referenced 10
in division (B) of this section. 11
(B) The registrar shall pay the contributions the 12
registrar collects in the fund as follows: 13
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 14
pursuant to section 4503.491 of the Revised Code to the breast 15
cancer fund of Ohio, which shall use that money only to pay for 16

S. B. No. 85 Page 2
As Passed by the Senate
programs that provide assistance and education to Ohio breast 17
cancer patients and that improve access for such patients to 18
quality health care and clinical trials and shall not use any of 19
the money for abortion information, counseling, services, or 20
other abortion-related activities. 21
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 22
receives pursuant to section 4503.492 of the Revised Code to the 23
organization cancer support community central Ohio, which shall 24
deposit the money into the Sheryl L. Kraner Fund of that 25
organization. Cancer support community central Ohio shall expend 26
the money it receives pursuant to this division only in the same 27
manner and for the same purposes as that organization expends 28
other money in that fund. 29
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 30
pursuant to section 4503.493 of the Revised Code to the autism 31
society of Ohio, which shall use the contributions for programs 32
and autism awareness efforts throughout the state. 33
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 34
receives pursuant to section 4503.494 of the Revised Code to the 35
national multiple sclerosis society for distribution in equal 36
amounts to the northwestern Ohio, Ohio buckeye, and Ohio valley 37
chapters of the national multiple sclerosis society. These 38
chapters shall use the money they receive under this section to 39
assist in paying the expenses they incur in providing services 40
directly to their clients. 41
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 42
receives pursuant to section 4503.495 of the Revised Code to the 43
national pancreatic cancer foundation, which shall use the money 44
it receives under this section to assist those who have 45
pancreatic cancer and their families. 46

S. B. No. 85 Page 3
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 47
receives pursuant to section 4503.496 of the Revised Code to the 48
Ohio sickle cell and health association, which shall use the 49
contributions to help support educational, clinical, and social 50
support services for adults who have sickle cell disease. 51
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 52
receives pursuant to section 4503.497 of the Revised Code to the 53
St. Baldrick's foundation, which shall use the contributions for 54
its research and other programs. 55
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 56
receives pursuant to section 4503.498 of the Revised Code to 57
special olympics Ohio, inc., which shall use the contributions 58
for its programs, charitable efforts, and other activities. 59
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 60
receives pursuant to section 4503.499 of the Revised Code to the 61
children's glioma cancer foundation, which shall use the 62
contributions for its research and other programs. 63
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 64
receives pursuant to section 4503.4910 of the Revised Code to 65
the KylerStrong foundation, which shall use the contributions to 66
raise awareness of brain cancer caused by diffuse intrinsic 67
pontine glioma and to fund research for the cure of such cancer. 68
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 69
receives pursuant to section 4503.4911 of the Revised Code to 70
the research institution for childhood cancer at nationwide 71
children's hospital, which shall use the contributions to fund 72
research for the cure of childhood cancers. 73
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 74
receives pursuant to section 4503.4912 of the Revised Code to 75

S. B. No. 85 Page 4
As Passed by the Senate
the Ben Morrison memorial fund, which shall use the 76
contributions for scholarships and other programs that support 77
mental health. 78
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 79
receives pursuant to section 4503.50 of the Revised Code to the 80
future farmers of America foundation, which shall deposit the 81
contributions into its general account to be used for 82
educational and scholarship purposes of the future farmers of 83
America foundation. 84
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 85
receives pursuant to section 4503.501 of the Revised Code to the 86
4-H youth development program of the Ohio state university 87
extension program, which shall use those contributions to pay 88
the expenses it incurs in conducting its educational activities. 89
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 90
pursuant to section 4503.502 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 91
cattlemen's foundation, which shall use those contributions for 92
scholarships and other educational activities. 93
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 94
pursuant to section 4503.505 of the Revised Code to the 95
organization Ohio region phi theta kappa, which shall use those 96
contributions for scholarships for students who are members of 97
that organization. 98
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 99
receives pursuant to section 4503.506 of the Revised Code to 100
Ohio demolay, which shall use the contributions for 101
scholarships, educational programs, and any other programs or 102
events the organization holds or sponsors in this state. 103
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 104

S. B. No. 85 Page 5
As Passed by the Senate
pursuant to section 4503.507 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 105
aerospace institute, which shall use those contributions to 106
facilitate student internships in aerospace and educational 107
programming. 108
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 109
pursuant to section 4503.508 of the Revised Code to the 110
organization bottoms up diaper drive to provide funding for that 111
organization for collecting and delivering diapers to parents in 112
need. 113
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 114
receives pursuant to section 4503.509 of the Revised Code to a 115
kid again, incorporated for distribution in equal amounts to the 116
Ohio chapters of a kid again. 117
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 118
receives pursuant to section 4503.51 of the Revised Code to the 119
university or college whose name or marking or design appears on 120
collegiate license plates that are issued to a person under that 121
section. A university or college that receives contributions 122
from the fund shall deposit the contributions into its general 123
scholarship fund. 124
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 125
receives pursuant to section 4503.512 of the Revised Code to the 126
Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated Delta Theta Omega 127
chapter in Ohio. The Iota Phi Theta Fraternity, Incorporated 128
Delta Theta Omega chapter shall use the contributions for the 129
development and perpetuation of scholarship, leadership, 130
citizenship, fidelity, and brotherhood among men and youth in 131
this state. 132
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 133

S. B. No. 85 Page 6
As Passed by the Senate
receives pursuant to section 4503.514 of the Revised Code to the 134
university of Notre Dame in South Bend, Indiana, for purposes of 135
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 136
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 137
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 138
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 139
university of Notre Dame to effectuate the distribution of such 140
funds as provided in this section. 141
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 142
receives pursuant to section 4503.516 of the Revised Code to 143
Marshall university in Huntington, West Virginia, for purposes 144
of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who 145
attend the university. The university shall not use any of the 146
funds it receives for purposes of administering the scholarship 147
program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements 148
with Marshall university to effectuate the distribution of such 149
funds as provided in this section. 150
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 151
receives pursuant to section 4503.517 of the Revised Code to the 152
university of Alabama in Tuscaloosa, Alabama, for purposes of 153
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 154
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 155
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 156
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with the 157
university of Alabama to effectuate the distribution of such 158
funds as provided in this section. 159
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 160
receives pursuant to section 4503.518 of the Revised Code to the 161
Nationwide children's hospital, which shall use the 162
contributions for the "On Our Sleeves" campaign. 163

S. B. No. 85 Page 7
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 164
receives pursuant to section 4503.519 of the Revised Code 165
equally to NAMI Ohio (national alliance on mental illness of 166
Ohio), Ohio peer recovery organizations, and OCAAR (Ohio citizen 167
advocates for addiction recovery). 168
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 169
receives pursuant to section 4503.520 of the Revised Code to 170
Purdue university in West Lafayette, Indiana, for purposes of 171
awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio who attend 172
the university. The university shall not use any of the funds it 173
receives for purposes of administering the scholarship program. 174
The registrar shall enter into appropriate agreements with 175
Purdue university to effectuate the distribution of such funds 176
as provided in this section. 177
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 178
receives pursuant to section 4503.521 of the Revised Code to the 179
Ohio bicycle federation to assist that organization in paying 180
for the educational programs it sponsors in support of Ohio 181
cyclists of all ages. 182
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 183
receives pursuant to section 4503.522 of the Revised Code to the 184
"friends of Perry's victory and international peace memorial, 185
incorporated," a nonprofit corporation organized under the laws 186
of this state, to assist that organization in paying the 187
expenses it incurs in sponsoring or holding charitable, 188
educational, and cultural events at the monument. 189
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 190
receives pursuant to section 4503.523 of the Revised Code to the 191
fairport lights foundation, which shall use the money to pay for 192
the restoration, maintenance, and preservation of the 193

S. B. No. 85 Page 8
As Passed by the Senate
lighthouses of fairport harbor. 194
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 195
receives pursuant to section 4503.524 of the Revised Code to the 196
Massillon tiger football booster club, which shall use the 197
contributions only to promote and support the football team of 198
Washington high school of the Massillon city school district. 199
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 200
receives pursuant to section 4503.525 of the Revised Code to the 201
United States power squadron district seven which shall annually 202
distribute the contributions in equal amounts to all United 203
States power squadrons located in the state. Each power squadron 204
district shall use the money it receives under this section to 205
pay for the educational boating programs each district holds or 206
sponsors within this state. 207
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 208
receives pursuant to section 4503.526 of the Revised Code to the 209
Ohio district Kiwanis foundation of the Ohio district of Kiwanis 210
international, which shall use the money it receives under this 211
section to pay the costs of its educational and humanitarian 212
activities. 213
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 214
receives pursuant to section 4503.528 of the Revised Code to the 215
Ohio children's alliance, which shall use the money it receives 216
under this section to pay the expenses it incurs in advancing 217
its mission of sustainably improving the provision of services 218
to children, young adults, and families in this state. 219
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 220
receives pursuant to section 4503.529 of the Revised Code to the 221
Ohio nurses foundation. The foundation shall use the money it 222

S. B. No. 85 Page 9
As Passed by the Senate
receives under this section to provide educational scholarships 223
to assist individuals who aspire to join the nursing profession, 224
to assist nurses in the nursing profession who seek to advance 225
their education, and to support persons conducting nursing 226
research concerning the evidence-based practice of nursing and 227
the improvement of patient outcomes. 228
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 229
receives pursuant to section 4503.53 of the Revised Code to the 230
Indiana Kentucky Ohio regional council of carpenters. The 231
council shall use the money it receives to assist its members 232
who are experiencing financial hardship. 233
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 234
receives pursuant to section 4503.531 of the Revised Code to the 235
thank you foundation, incorporated, a nonprofit corporation 236
organized under the laws of this state, to assist that 237
organization in paying for the charitable activities and 238
programs it sponsors in support of United States military 239
personnel, veterans, and their families. 240
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 241
receives pursuant to section 4503.532 of the Revised Code to the 242
Ohio history connection, which shall use the contributions for 243
the benefit of the Paul Laurence Dunbar house. 244
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 245
receives pursuant to section 4503.533 of the Revised Code to the 246
nonprofit organization Ohio conference of teamsters and industry 247
health and welfare fund, which shall use the contributions to 248
further the nonprofit's mission. 249
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 250
receives pursuant to section 4503.534 of the Revised Code to the 251

S. B. No. 85 Page 10
As Passed by the Senate
disabled American veterans department of Ohio, to be used for 252
programs that serve disabled American veterans and their 253
families. 254
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 255
receives pursuant to section 4503.536 of the Revised Code to 256
save a warrior, incorporated, which shall use the contributions 257
to prevent suicide by active members of the armed forces of the 258
United States, veterans of those armed forces, and first 259
responders. 260
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 261
receives pursuant to section 4503.542 of the Revised Code to the 262
Ohio craft brewers association. 263
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 264
receives pursuant to section 4503.541 of the Revised Code to 265
Dolly Parton's imagination library of Ohio. The library shall 266
use the money it receives under this section for operational 267
costs, including the distribution of books. 268
The registrar shall pay the contributions that are paid to 269
the registrar pursuant to section 4503.545 of the Revised Code 270
to the national rifle association foundation, which shall use 271
the money to pay the costs of the educational activities and 272
programs the foundation holds or sponsors in this state. 273
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 274
receives pursuant to section 4503.55 of the Revised Code to the 275
pro football hall of fame, which shall deposit the contributions 276
into a special bank account that it establishes and which shall 277
be separate and distinct from any other account the pro football 278
hall of fame maintains, to be used exclusively for the purpose 279
of promoting the pro football hall of fame as a travel 280

S. B. No. 85 Page 11
As Passed by the Senate
destination. 281
The registrar shall pay to the Ohio pet fund the 282
contributions the registrar receives pursuant to section 283
4503.551 of the Revised Code and any other money from any other 284
source, including donations, gifts, and grants, that is 285
designated by the source to be paid to the Ohio pet fund. The 286
Ohio pet fund shall use the moneys it receives under this 287
section to support programs for the sterilization of dogs and 288
cats and for educational programs concerning the proper 289
veterinary care of those animals, and for expenses of the Ohio 290
pet fund that are reasonably necessary for it to obtain and 291
maintain its tax-exempt status and to perform its duties. 292
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 293
receives pursuant to section 4503.552 of the Revised Code to the 294
rock and roll hall of fame and museum, incorporated. 295
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 296
receives pursuant to section 4503.553 of the Revised Code to the 297
Ohio coalition for animals, incorporated, a nonprofit 298
corporation. Except as provided in division (B) of this section, 299
the coalition shall distribute the money to its members, and the 300
members shall use the money only to pay for educational, 301
charitable, and other programs of each coalition member that 302
provide care for unwanted, abused, and neglected horses. The 303
Ohio coalition for animals may use a portion of the money to pay 304
for reasonable marketing costs incurred in the design and 305
promotion of the license plate and for administrative costs 306
incurred in the disbursement and management of funds received 307
under this section. 308
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 309
receives pursuant to section 4503.554 of the Revised Code to the 310

S. B. No. 85 Page 12
As Passed by the Senate
Ohio state council of the knights of Columbus, which shall use 311
the contributions to pay for its charitable activities and 312
programs. 313
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 314
receives pursuant to section 4503.555 of the Revised Code to the 315
western reserve historical society, which shall use the 316
contributions to fund the Crawford auto aviation museum. 317
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 318
receives pursuant to section 4503.556 of the Revised Code to the 319
Erica J. Holloman foundation, inc., for the awareness of triple 320
negative breast cancer. The foundation shall use the 321
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 322
The registrar shall pay each contribution the registrar 323
receives pursuant to section 4503.557 of the Revised Code to the 324
central Ohio chapter of the Ronald McDonald house charities, 325
which shall distribute the contribution to the chapter of the 326
Ronald McDonald house charities in whose geographic territory 327
the person who paid the contribution resides. 328
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 329
receives pursuant to section 4503.559 of the Revised Code to 330
playhouse square, located in Cleveland, Ohio, which shall use 331
the contributions to further its mission of presenting and 332
producing a wide variety of quality performing arts, advancing 333
arts education, and creating a superior destination for 334
entertainment, business, and residential living. 335
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 336
receives pursuant to section 4503.561 of the Revised Code to the 337
state of Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., which shall 338
deposit the contributions into a special bank account that it 339

S. B. No. 85 Page 13
As Passed by the Senate
establishes. The special bank account shall be separate and 340
distinct from any other account the state of Ohio chapter of 341
ducks unlimited, inc., maintains and shall be used exclusively 342
for the purpose of protecting, enhancing, restoring, and 343
managing wetlands and conserving wildlife habitat. The state of 344
Ohio chapter of ducks unlimited, inc., annually shall notify the 345
registrar in writing of the name, address, and account to which 346
such payments are to be made. 347
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 348
receives pursuant to section 4503.562 of the Revised Code to the 349
Mahoning river consortium, which shall use the money to pay the 350
expenses it incurs in restoring and maintaining the Mahoning 351
river watershed. 352
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 353
receives pursuant to section 4503.564 of the Revised Code to the 354
Glen Helen association to pay expenses related to the Glen Helen 355
nature preserve. 356
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 357
receives pursuant to section 4503.565 of the Revised Code to the 358
conservancy for Cuyahoga valley national park, which shall use 359
the money in support of the park. 360
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 361
receives pursuant to section 4503.566 of the Revised Code to the 362
Ottawa national wildlife refuge, which shall use the 363
contributions for wildlife preservation purposes. 364
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 365
receives pursuant to section 4503.567 of the Revised Code to the 366
girls on the run of Franklin county, inc., which shall use the 367
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 368

S. B. No. 85 Page 14
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 369
receives pursuant to section 4503.569 of the Revised Code to the 370
Ohio bird sanctuary, located in Mansfield, Ohio, which shall use 371
the contributions for purposes of its operations, bird care and 372
rehabilitation, and educational programs. 373
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 374
receives pursuant to section 4503.576 of the Revised Code to the 375
Ohio state beekeepers association, which shall use those 376
contributions to promote beekeeping, provide educational 377
information about beekeeping, and to support other state and 378
local beekeeping programs. 379
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 380
receives pursuant to section 4503.577 of the Revised Code to the 381
national aviation hall of fame, which shall use the 382
contributions to fulfill its mission of honoring aerospace 383
legends to inspire future leaders. 384
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 385
receives pursuant to section 4503.578 of the Revised Code to 386
keep Ohio beautiful, incorporated, which shall use the 387
contributions towards its mission of empowering Ohio communities 388
to take greater responsibility for improving the local 389
environment through litter prevention, beautification, community 390
greening, waste reduction, and recycling. 391
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 392
receives pursuant to section 4503.579 of the Revised Code to the 393
national council of negro women, incorporated, which shall use 394
the contributions for educational purposes. 395
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 396
receives pursuant to section 4503.581 of the Revised Code to the 397

S. B. No. 85 Page 15
As Passed by the Senate
Ohio past detachment commander's club, inc., which shall use the 398
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 399
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 400
receives pursuant to section 4503.582 of the Revised Code to the 401
progressive animal welfare society adoption center, inc., which 402
shall use the contributions to support the activities of the 403
center. 404
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 405
receives pursuant to section 4503.583 of the Revised Code to the 406
American legion, department of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 407
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 408
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 409
receives pursuant to section 4503.584 of the Revised Code to the 410
Ohio natural energy foundation to fund scholarships for students 411
pursuing careers in the oil and natural gas industry. 412
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 413
receives pursuant to section 4503.585 of the Revised Code to the 414
Terrace Park recreation committee, inc. to offer scholarships to 415
young athletes of, and maintain athletic facilities in, the 416
municipal corporation of Terrace Park. 417
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 418
receives pursuant to section 4503.586 of the Revised Code to the 419
Ohio mountain bike alliance. 420
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 421
receives pursuant to section 4503.588 of the Revised Code to the 422
Ohio grange patrons of husbandry foundation, which shall use the 423
contributions to support the activities of the organization. 424
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 425
receives pursuant to section 4503.589 of the Revised Code to the 426

S. B. No. 85 Page 16
As Passed by the Senate
Ohio conference of units of the national association for the 427
advancement of colored people (NAACP), which shall use the 428
contributions to further the mission of the association. 429
The registrar shall pay to a sports commission created 430
pursuant to section 4503.591 of the Revised Code each 431
contribution the registrar receives under that section that an 432
applicant pays to obtain license plates that bear the logo of a 433
professional sports team located in the county of that sports 434
commission and that is participating in the license plate 435
program pursuant to division (E) of that section, irrespective 436
of the county of residence of an applicant. 437
The registrar shall pay to a community charity each 438
contribution the registrar receives under section 4503.591 of 439
the Revised Code that an applicant pays to obtain license plates 440
that bear the logo of a professional sports team that is 441
participating in the license plate program pursuant to division 442
(G) of that section. 443
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 444
receives pursuant to section 4503.592 of the Revised Code to 445
pollinator partnership's monarch wings across Ohio program, 446
which shall use the contributions for the protection and 447
preservation of the monarch butterfly and pollinator corridor in 448
Ohio and for educational programs. 449
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 450
receives pursuant to section 4503.594 of the Revised Code to 451
pelotonia, which shall use the contributions for the purpose of 452
supporting cancer research. 453
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 454
receives pursuant to section 4503.595 of the Revised Code to the 455

S. B. No. 85 Page 17
As Passed by the Senate
Stan Hywet hall and gardens. 456
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 457
receives pursuant to section 4503.596 of the Revised Code to the 458
Cuyahoga valley scenic railroad. 459
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 460
receives pursuant to section 4503.597 of the Revised Code to the 461
Circleville pumpkin show, incorporated, which shall use the 462
contributions to promote good will surrounding the Circleville 463
pumpkin show as a nonprofit annual event. 464
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 465
receives pursuant to section 4503.598 of the Revised Code 466
equally to the Jackson local schools foundation and the Jackson 467
high school alumni association. The foundation and alumni 468
association shall use the contributions for the foundation's and 469
alumni association's purposes. 470
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 471
receives pursuant to section 4503.67 of the Revised Code to the 472
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 473
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 474
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 475
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 476
receives pursuant to section 4503.68 of the Revised Code to the 477
girl scouts of Ohio's heartland. The girl scouts of Ohio's 478
heartland shall distribute all contributions in an equitable 479
manner throughout the state to regional councils of the girl 480
scouts. 481
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 482
receives pursuant to section 4503.69 of the Revised Code to the 483
Dan Beard council of the boy scouts of America. The council 484

S. B. No. 85 Page 18
As Passed by the Senate
shall distribute all contributions in an equitable manner 485
throughout the state to regional councils of the boy scouts. 486
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 487
receives pursuant to section 4503.70 of the Revised Code to the 488
charitable foundation of the grand lodge of Ohio, f. & a. m., 489
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 490
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 491
receives pursuant to section 4503.701 of the Revised Code to the 492
Prince Hall grand lodge of free and accepted masons of Ohio, 493
which shall use the contributions for scholarship purposes. 494
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 495
receives pursuant to section 4503.702 of the Revised Code to the 496
Ohio Association of the Improved Benevolent and Protective Order 497
of the Elks of the World, which shall use the funds for 498
charitable purposes. 499
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 500
receives pursuant to section 4503.703 of the Revised Code to the 501
Ohio state moose association. 502
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 503
receives pursuant to section 4503.704 of the Revised Code to the 504
Antioch shrine foundation located in the municipal corporation 505
of Dayton. 506
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 507
receives pursuant to section 4503.71 of the Revised Code to the 508
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 509
deposit the fees into its general account to be used for 510
purposes of the fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated. 511
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 512
receives pursuant to section 4503.711 of the Revised Code to the 513

S. B. No. 85 Page 19
As Passed by the Senate
fraternal order of police of Ohio, incorporated, which shall 514
deposit the contributions into an account that it creates to be 515
used for the purpose of advancing and protecting the law 516
enforcement profession, promoting improved law enforcement 517
methods, and teaching respect for law and order. 518
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 519
pursuant to section 4503.712 of the Revised Code to Ohio 520
concerns of police survivors, which shall use those 521
contributions to provide whatever assistance may be appropriate 522
to the families of Ohio law enforcement officers who are killed 523
in the line of duty. 524
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 525
pursuant to section 4503.713 of the Revised Code to the greater 526
Cleveland peace officers memorial society, which shall use those 527
contributions to honor law enforcement officers who have died in 528
the line of duty and support its charitable purposes. 529
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 530
pursuant to section 4503.714 of the Revised Code to the Ohio 531
association of chiefs of police. 532
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 533
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.715 of the 534
Revised Code to the community foundation of Ohio's electric 535
cooperatives, which shall use the contributions to recognize and 536
memorialize fallen or injured lineworkers and support their 537
families. 538
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 539
receives pursuant to section 4503.716 of the Revised Code to the 540
fallen timbers battlefield preservation commission, which shall 541
use the contributions to further the mission of the commission. 542

S. B. No. 85 Page 20
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 543
receives pursuant to section 4503.72 of the Revised Code to the 544
organization known on March 31, 2003, as the Ohio CASA/GAL 545
association, a private, nonprofit corporation organized under 546
Chapter 1702. of the Revised Code. The Ohio CASA/GAL association 547
shall use these contributions to pay the expenses it incurs in 548
administering a program to secure the proper representation in 549
the courts of this state of abused, neglected, and dependent 550
children, and for the training and supervision of persons 551
participating in that program. 552
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 553
receives pursuant to section 4503.722 of the Revised Code to the 554
Down Syndrome Association of Central Ohio, which shall use the 555
contributions for advocacy purposes throughout the state. 556
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 557
receives pursuant to section 4503.724 of the Revised Code to the 558
Ohio Chapter of the American Foundation for Suicide Prevention, 559
which shall use the contributions for programs, education, and 560
advocacy purposes throughout the state. 561
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 562
receives pursuant to section 4503.726 of the Revised Code to the 563
Ohio suicide prevention foundation, which shall use the 564
contributions for suicide prevention programs, education, and 565
advocacy. 566
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 567
receives, or has received, pursuant to section 4503.725 of the 568
Revised Code to the ALS united Ohio, incorporated, which shall 569
split the contributions between that organization and the ALS 570
association in accordance with any agreement between the two 571
organizations. The contributions shall be used to discover 572

S. B. No. 85 Page 21
As Passed by the Senate
treatments and a cure for ALS, and to serve, advocate for, and 573
empower people affected by ALS to live their lives to the 574
fullest. 575
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 576
receives pursuant to section 4503.73 of the Revised Code to 577
Wright B. Flyer, incorporated, which shall deposit the 578
contributions into its general account to be used for purposes 579
of Wright B. Flyer, incorporated. 580
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 581
receives pursuant to section 4503.732 of the Revised Code to the 582
Siegel Shuster society, a nonprofit organization dedicated to 583
commemorating and celebrating the creation of Superman in 584
Cleveland, Ohio. 585
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 586
receives pursuant to section 4503.733 of the Revised Code to the 587
central Ohio chapter of the juvenile diabetes research 588
foundation, which shall distribute the contributions to the 589
chapters of the juvenile diabetes research foundation in whose 590
geographic territory the person who paid the contribution 591
resides. 592
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 593
receives pursuant to section 4503.734 of the Revised Code to the 594
Ohio highway patrol auxiliary foundation, which shall use the 595
contributions to fulfill the foundation's mission of supporting 596
law enforcement education and assistance. 597
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 598
receives pursuant to section 4503.735 of the Revised Code to the 599
heart4seniors/healthcare evolution alert response technology 600
foundation, inc., which shall use the contributions for purposes 601

S. B. No. 85 Page 22
As Passed by the Senate
of the foundation's mission. 602
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 603
receives pursuant to section 4503.74 of the Revised Code to the 604
Columbus zoological park association, which shall disburse the 605
moneys to Ohio's major metropolitan zoos, as defined in section 606
4503.74 of the Revised Code, in accordance with a written 607
agreement entered into by the major metropolitan zoos. 608
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 609
receives pursuant to section 4503.741 of the Revised Code to the 610
Ohio house rabbit rescue, which shall use the contributions for 611
its rescue, adoption, and educational programs. 612
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 613
receives pursuant to section 4503.75 of the Revised Code to the 614
rotary foundation, located on March 31, 2003, in Evanston, 615
Illinois, to be placed in a fund known as the permanent fund and 616
used to endow educational and humanitarian programs of the 617
rotary foundation. 618
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 619
receives pursuant to section 4503.751 of the Revised Code to the 620
Ohio association of realtors, which shall deposit the 621
contributions into a property disaster relief fund maintained 622
under the Ohio realtors charitable and education foundation. 623
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 624
receives pursuant to section 4503.752 of the Revised Code to 625
buckeye corvettes, incorporated, which shall use the 626
contributions to pay for its charitable activities and programs. 627
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 628
receives pursuant to section 4503.754 of the Revised Code to the 629
municipal corporation of Twinsburg. 630

S. B. No. 85 Page 23
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 631
receives pursuant to section 4503.755 of the Revised Code to the 632
little brown jug society to assist the society in maintaining, 633
promulgating, and operating the little brown jug as part of 634
Ohio's rich harness racing history. 635
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 636
receives pursuant to section 4503.763 of the Revised Code to the 637
Ohio history connection to be used solely to build, support, and 638
maintain the Ohio battleflag collection within the Ohio history 639
connection. 640
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 641
receives pursuant to section 4503.764 of the Revised Code to the 642
Medina county historical society, which shall use those 643
contributions to distribute between the various historical 644
societies and museums in Medina county. 645
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 646
receives pursuant to section 4503.765 of the Revised Code to the 647
Amaranth grand chapter foundation, which shall use the 648
contributions for communal outreach, charitable service, and 649
scholarship purposes. 650
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 651
receives pursuant to section 4503.766 of the Revised Code to the 652
Ohio society daughters of the American revolution, which shall 653
deposit the contributions into its general account to be used 654
for continuing the organization's endeavors in service, historic 655
preservation, education, and patriotism. 656
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 657
receives pursuant to section 4503.767 of the Revised Code to 658
folds of honor of central Ohio, which shall use the 659

S. B. No. 85 Page 24
As Passed by the Senate
contributions to provide scholarships to spouses and children 660
either of disabled veterans or of members of any branch of the 661
armed forces who died during their service. 662
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 663
receives pursuant to section 4503.85 of the Revised Code to the 664
Ohio sea grant college program to be used for Lake Erie area 665
research projects. 666
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 667
receives pursuant to section 4503.851 of the Revised Code to 668
West Virginia university in Morgantown, West Virginia for 669
purposes of awarding grants or scholarships to residents of Ohio 670
who attend the university. The university shall not use any of 671
the funds it receives for purposes of administering the 672
scholarship program. The registrar shall enter into appropriate 673
agreements with West Virginia university to effectuate the 674
distribution of such funds as provided in this section. 675
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 676
receives pursuant to section 4503.86 of the Revised Code to the 677
Ohio Lincoln highway historic byway, which shall use those 678
contributions solely to promote and support the historical 679
preservation and advertisement of the Lincoln highway in this 680
state. 681
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 682
receives pursuant to section 4503.87 of the Revised Code to the 683
Grove City little league dream field fund, which shall use those 684
contributions solely to build, maintain, and improve youth 685
baseball fields within the municipal corporation of Grove City. 686
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 687
receives pursuant to section 4503.871 of the Revised Code to the 688

S. B. No. 85 Page 25
As Passed by the Senate
Solon city school district. The school district shall use the 689
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 690
providing services to the school district's students that assist 691
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 692
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 693
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 694
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 695
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 696
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school district 697
superintendent or, in the school district superintendent's 698
discretion, the appropriate school principal or appropriate 699
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 700
that the school district hires to provide those services. The 701
school district also may use the contributions it receives to 702
pay for members of the faculty of the school district to receive 703
training in providing such services to the students of the 704
school district. The school district shall ensure that any 705
charitable organization that is hired by the district is exempt 706
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 707
Internal Revenue Code. The school district shall not use the 708
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 709
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 710
receives pursuant to section 4503.872 of the Revised Code to the 711
Canton city school district. The district may use the 712
contributions for student welfare, but shall not use the 713
contributions for any political purpose or to pay salaries of 714
district employees. 715
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 716
receives pursuant to section 4503.873 of the Revised Code to 717
Padua Franciscan high school located in the municipal 718
corporation of Parma. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 719

S. B. No. 85 Page 26
As Passed by the Senate
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 720
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 721
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 722
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 723
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 724
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 725
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 726
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 727
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 728
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 729
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 730
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 731
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 732
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 733
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 734
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 735
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 736
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 737
purpose. 738
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 739
receives pursuant to section 4503.874 of the Revised Code to St. 740
Edward high school located in the municipal corporation of 741
Lakewood. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 742
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 743
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 744
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 745
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 746
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 747
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 748
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 749
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 750

S. B. No. 85 Page 27
As Passed by the Senate
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 751
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 752
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 753
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 754
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 755
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 756
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 757
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 758
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 759
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 760
purpose. 761
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 762
receives pursuant to section 4503.875 of the Revised Code to 763
Walsh Jesuit high school located in the municipal corporation of 764
Cuyahoga Falls. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 765
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 766
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 767
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 768
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 769
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 770
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 771
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 772
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 773
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 774
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 775
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 776
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 777
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 778
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 779
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 780
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 781

S. B. No. 85 Page 28
As Passed by the Senate
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 782
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 783
purpose. 784
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 785
receives pursuant to section 4503.876 of the Revised Code to the 786
North Royalton city school district. The school district shall 787
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 788
in providing services to the school district's students that 789
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 790
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 791
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 792
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 793
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 794
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 795
district superintendent or, in the school district 796
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 797
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 798
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 799
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 800
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 801
district to receive training in providing such services to the 802
students of the school district. The school district shall 803
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 804
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 805
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 806
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 807
purpose. 808
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 809
receives pursuant to section 4503.877 of the Revised Code to the 810
Independence local school district. The school district shall 811
use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs 812

S. B. No. 85 Page 29
As Passed by the Senate
in providing services to the school district's students that 813
assist in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional 814
well-being of the students. The services provided may include 815
bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 816
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 817
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 818
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 819
district superintendent or, in the school district 820
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 821
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 822
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 823
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 824
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 825
district to receive training in providing such services to the 826
students of the school district. The school district shall 827
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 828
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 829
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 830
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 831
purpose. 832
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 833
receives pursuant to section 4503.878 of the Revised Code to the 834
Cuyahoga Heights local school district. The school district 835
shall use the contributions it receives to pay the expenses it 836
incurs in providing services to the school district's students 837
that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 838
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 839
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 840
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 841
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 842
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The school 843

S. B. No. 85 Page 30
As Passed by the Senate
district superintendent or, in the school district 844
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 845
appropriate school counselors, shall determine any charitable 846
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 847
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 848
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 849
district to receive training in providing such services to the 850
students of the school district. The school district shall 851
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 852
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 853
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 854
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 855
purpose. 856
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 857
receives pursuant to section 4503.879 of the Revised Code to the 858
west technical high school alumni association, which shall use 859
the contributions for activities sponsored by the association. 860
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 861
receives pursuant to section 4503.88 of the Revised Code to the 862
Kenston local school district. The school district shall use the 863
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 864
providing services that assist in developing or maintaining a 865
culture of environmental responsibility and an innovative 866
science, technology, engineering, art, and math (S.T.E.A.M.) 867
curriculum to the school district's students. The school 868
district shall not use the contributions it receives for any 869
other purpose. 870
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 871
receives pursuant to section 4503.881 of the Revised Code to La 872
Salle high school in the municipal corporation of Cincinnati. 873

S. B. No. 85 Page 31
As Passed by the Senate
The high school shall not use the contributions it receives for 874
any political purpose. 875
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 876
receives pursuant to section 4503.882 of the Revised Code to St. 877
John's Jesuit high school and academy located in the municipal 878
corporation of Toledo. The school shall use the contributions it 879
receives to provide tuition assistance for students attending 880
the school. 881
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 882
receives pursuant to section 4503.883 of the Revised Code to St. 883
Charles preparatory school located in the municipal corporation 884
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 885
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 886
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 887
receives pursuant to section 4503.884 of the Revised Code to 888
Archbishop Moeller high school located in the municipal 889
corporation of Cincinnati. The high school shall not use the 890
contributions it receives for any political purpose. 891
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 892
receives pursuant to section 4503.885 of the Revised Code to the 893
Revere schools foundation. The foundation shall use the 894
contributions to promote its mission, including awarding 895
scholarships to honor young people who are meaningfully engaged 896
in their school or community. The foundation shall not use the 897
contributions for any political purpose. 898
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 899
receives pursuant to section 4503.886 of the Revised Code to 900
Stephen T. Badin high school in the municipal corporation of 901
Hamilton. 902

S. B. No. 85 Page 32
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 903
receives pursuant to section 4503.887 of the Revised Code to 904
Bishop Hartley high school located in the municipal corporation 905
of Columbus, which shall use the contributions for the school's 906
alumni association and the alumni association's purposes. 907
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 908
receives pursuant to section 4503.888 of the Revised Code to St. 909
Vincent-St. Mary high school located in the municipal 910
corporation of Akron. 911
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 912
receives pursuant to section 4503.89 of the Revised Code to the 913
American red cross of greater Columbus on behalf of the Ohio 914
chapters of the American red cross, which shall use the 915
contributions for disaster readiness, preparedness, and response 916
programs on a statewide basis. 917
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 918
receives pursuant to section 4503.891 of the Revised Code to the 919
Ohio lions foundation. The foundation shall use the 920
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 921
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 922
receives pursuant to section 4503.892 of the Revised Code to the 923
Hudson city school district. The school district shall not use 924
the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 925
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 926
receives pursuant to section 4503.893 of the Revised Code to the 927
Harrison Central jr./sr. high school located in the municipal 928
corporation of Cadiz. 929
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 930
receives pursuant to section 4503.894 of the Revised Code to the 931

S. B. No. 85 Page 33
As Passed by the Senate
Blanchester schools foundation for funding student scholarships 932
and for funding activities and programs for at-risk students. 933
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 934
receives pursuant to section 4503.895 of the Revised Code to the 935
Lakeside Chautauqua foundation. The foundation shall use the 936
contributions it receives for conservation and preservation of 937
Lake Erie and the surrounding ecosystem. 938
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 939
receives pursuant to section 4503.896 of the Revised Code to the 940
American legion auxiliary department of Ohio. The auxiliary 941
department shall use the contributions it receives to support 942
the American legion, current and former military members, and 943
their families. 944
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 945
receives pursuant to section 4503.899 of the Revised Code to the 946
Cleveland clinic foundation, which shall use the contributions 947
to support Cleveland clinic children's education, research, and 948
patient services. 949
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 950
receives pursuant to section 4503.90 of the Revised Code to the 951
nationwide children's hospital foundation. 952
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 953
receives pursuant to section 4503.901 of the Revised Code to the 954
Ohio association for pupil transportation, which shall use the 955
money to support transportation programs, provide training to 956
school transportation professionals, and support other 957
initiatives for school transportation safety. 958
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 959
receives pursuant to section 4503.902 of the Revised Code to St. 960

S. B. No. 85 Page 34
As Passed by the Senate
Ignatius high school located in the municipal corporation of 961
Cleveland. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 962
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 963
students. The school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to 964
pay the expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 965
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 966
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 967
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 968
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 969
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 970
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 971
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 972
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 973
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 974
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 975
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 976
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 977
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 978
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 979
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 980
purpose. 981
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 982
receives pursuant to section 4503.903 of the Revised Code to the 983
Brecksville-Broadview Heights city school district. The school 984
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 985
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 986
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 987
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 988
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 989
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 990
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 991

S. B. No. 85 Page 35
As Passed by the Senate
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 992
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 993
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 994
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 995
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 996
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 997
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 998
district to receive training in providing such services to the 999
students of the school district. The school district shall 1000
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1001
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1002
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1003
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1004
purpose. 1005
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1006
receives pursuant to section 4503.904 of the Revised Code to the 1007
Chagrin Falls exempted village school district. The school 1008
district shall use the contributions it receives to pay the 1009
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school 1010
district's students that assist in developing or maintaining the 1011
mental and emotional well-being of the students. The services 1012
provided may include bereavement counseling, instruction in 1013
defensive driving techniques, sensitivity training, and the 1014
counseling and education of students regarding bullying, dating 1015
violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. 1016
The school district superintendent or, in the school district 1017
superintendent's discretion, the appropriate school principal or 1018
appropriate school counselors shall determine any charitable 1019
organizations that the school district hires to provide those 1020
services. The school district also may use the contributions it 1021
receives to pay for members of the faculty of the school 1022

S. B. No. 85 Page 36
As Passed by the Senate
district to receive training in providing such services to the 1023
students of the school district. The school district shall 1024
ensure that any charitable organization that is hired by the 1025
district is exempt from federal income taxation under subsection 1026
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school district 1027
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1028
purpose. 1029
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1030
receives pursuant to section 4503.905 of the Revised Code to the 1031
Cuyahoga valley career center. The career center shall use the 1032
contributions it receives to pay the expenses it incurs in 1033
providing services to the career center's students that assist 1034
in developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being 1035
of the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1036
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1037
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1038
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1039
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. The career center's 1040
superintendent or in the career center's superintendent's 1041
discretion, the school board or appropriate school counselors 1042
shall determine any charitable organizations that the career 1043
center hires to provide those services. The career center also 1044
may use the contributions it receives to pay for members of the 1045
faculty of the career center to receive training in providing 1046
such services to the students of the career center. The career 1047
center shall ensure that any charitable organization that is 1048
hired by the career center is exempt from federal income 1049
taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 1050
Code. The career center shall not use the contributions it 1051
receives for any other purpose. 1052
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1053

S. B. No. 85 Page 37
As Passed by the Senate
receives pursuant to section 4503.906 of the Revised Code to the 1054
Stow-Munroe Falls city school district. The school district 1055
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1056
purpose. 1057
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1058
receives pursuant to section 4503.907 of the Revised Code to the 1059
Twinsburg city school district. The school district shall not 1060
use the contributions it receives for any political purpose. 1061
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1062
receives pursuant to section 4503.908 of the Revised Code to St. 1063
Xavier high school located in Springfield township in Hamilton 1064
county. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1065
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1066
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1067
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1068
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1069
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1070
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1071
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1072
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1073
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1074
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1075
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1076
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1077
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1078
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1079
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1080
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1081
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1082
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1083
purpose. 1084

S. B. No. 85 Page 38
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1085
receives pursuant to section 4503.909 of the Revised Code to the 1086
Grandview Heights city school district, which shall use the 1087
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1088
related services. 1089
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1090
pursuant to section 4503.92 of the Revised Code to support our 1091
troops, incorporated, a national nonprofit corporation, which 1092
shall use those contributions in accordance with its articles of 1093
incorporation and for the benefit of servicemembers of the armed 1094
forces of the United States and their families when they are in 1095
financial need. 1096
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1097
pursuant to section 4503.931 of the Revised Code to healthy New 1098
Albany, which shall use the contributions for its community 1099
programs, events, and other activities. 1100
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1101
receives pursuant to section 4503.932 of the Revised Code to 1102
habitat for humanity of Ohio, inc., which shall use the 1103
contributions for its projects related to building affordable 1104
houses. 1105
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1106
receives pursuant to section 4503.933 of the Revised Code to 1107
Ohio citizens for the arts foundation, which shall use the 1108
contributions for advocacy, education, and professional 1109
development programs. 1110
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1111
receives pursuant to section 4503.934 of the Revised Code to 1112
Ohio society for respiratory care of the American association 1113

S. B. No. 85 Page 39
As Passed by the Senate
for respiratory care, incorporated, which shall use the 1114
contributions to benefit the Ohio society for respiratory care 1115
student scholarship fund. 1116
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1117
receives pursuant to section 4503.935 of the Revised Code to 1118
Jesup W. Scott high school's principal activities fund. The high 1119
school shall use the contributions to enhance learning 1120
opportunities for the high school's students. 1121
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1122
receives pursuant to section 4503.936 of the Revised Code to the 1123
Hilliard Davidson baseball club, which shall use the 1124
contributions to support the team. 1125
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1126
receives pursuant to section 4503.94 of the Revised Code to the 1127
Michelle's leading star foundation, which shall use the money 1128
solely to fund the rental, lease, or purchase of the simulated 1129
driving curriculum of the Michelle's leading star foundation by 1130
boards of education of city, exempted village, local, and joint 1131
vocational school districts. 1132
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1133
receives pursuant to section 4503.941 of the Revised Code to the 1134
Ohio chapter international society of arboriculture, which shall 1135
use the money to increase consumer awareness on the importance 1136
of proper tree care and to raise funds for the chapter's 1137
educational efforts. 1138
The registrar shall pay the contributions received 1139
pursuant to section 4503.942 of the Revised Code to zero, the 1140
end of prostate cancer, incorporated, a nonprofit organization, 1141
which shall use those contributions to raise awareness of 1142

S. B. No. 85 Page 40
As Passed by the Senate
prostate cancer, to support research to end prostate cancer, and 1143
to support prostate cancer patients and their families. 1144
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1145
receives pursuant to section 4503.943 of the Revised Code to the 1146
nonprofit organization weirdo cat lovers of Cleveland, which 1147
shall use the contributions to further its mission of assisting 1148
pet parents with emergency veterinary bills for their feline 1149
companions, providing food and litter to those in economic need, 1150
and controlling feral cat populations through the process of 1151
trap-neuter-return to the community. 1152
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1153
receives pursuant to section 4503.944 of the Revised Code to the 1154
eastern European congress of Ohio, which shall use the 1155
contributions for charitable and educational purposes. 1156
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1157
receives pursuant to section 4503.945 of the Revised Code to the 1158
Summit metro parks foundation, which shall use the money in 1159
support of the Summit county metro parks. 1160
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1161
receives pursuant to section 4503.946 of the Revised Code to the 1162
Ohio society, sons of the American revolution, which shall use 1163
the contributions for special projects related to historical 1164
education. 1165
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1166
receives pursuant to section 4503.951 of the Revised Code to the 1167
Cincinnati city school district. 1168
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1169
receives pursuant to section 4503.952 of the Revised Code to 1170
Hawken school located in northeast Ohio. The school shall use 1171

S. B. No. 85 Page 41
As Passed by the Senate
fifty per cent of the contributions it receives to provide 1172
tuition assistance to its students. The school shall use the 1173
remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in 1174
providing services to the school's students that assist in 1175
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1176
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1177
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1178
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1179
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1180
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1181
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1182
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1183
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1184
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1185
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1186
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1187
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1188
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1189
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1190
purpose. 1191
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1192
receives pursuant to section 4503.953 of the Revised Code to 1193
Gilmour academy located in the municipal corporation of Gates 1194
Mills. The school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions 1195
it receives to provide tuition assistance to its students. The 1196
school shall use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the 1197
expenses it incurs in providing services to the school's 1198
students that assist in developing or maintaining the mental and 1199
emotional well-being of the students. The services provided may 1200
include bereavement counseling, instruction in defensive driving 1201
techniques, sensitivity training, and the counseling and 1202

S. B. No. 85 Page 42
As Passed by the Senate
education of students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug 1203
abuse, suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1204
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1205
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1206
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1207
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1208
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1209
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1210
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1211
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1212
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1213
purpose. 1214
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1215
receives pursuant to section 4503.954 of the Revised Code to 1216
University school located in the suburban area near the 1217
municipal corporation of Cleveland. The school shall use fifty 1218
per cent of the contributions it receives to provide tuition 1219
assistance to its students. The school shall use the remaining 1220
fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs in providing 1221
services to the school's students that assist in developing or 1222
maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of the students. 1223
The services provided may include bereavement counseling, 1224
instruction in defensive driving techniques, sensitivity 1225
training, and the counseling and education of students regarding 1226
bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, suicide prevention, and 1227
human trafficking. As a part of providing such services, the 1228
school may pay for members of the faculty of the school to 1229
receive training in providing those services. The school 1230
principal or, in the school principal's discretion, appropriate 1231
school counselors shall determine any charitable organizations 1232
that the school hires to provide those services. The school 1233

S. B. No. 85 Page 43
As Passed by the Senate
shall ensure that any such charitable organization is exempt 1234
from federal income taxation under subsection 501(c)(3) of the 1235
Internal Revenue Code. The school shall not use the 1236
contributions it receives for any other purpose. 1237
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1238
receives pursuant to section 4503.955 of the Revised Code to 1239
Saint Albert the Great school located in North Royalton. The 1240
school shall use fifty per cent of the contributions it receives 1241
to provide tuition assistance to its students. The school shall 1242
use the remaining fifty per cent to pay the expenses it incurs 1243
in providing services to the school's students that assist in 1244
developing or maintaining the mental and emotional well-being of 1245
the students. The services provided may include bereavement 1246
counseling, instruction in defensive driving techniques, 1247
sensitivity training, and the counseling and education of 1248
students regarding bullying, dating violence, drug abuse, 1249
suicide prevention, and human trafficking. As a part of 1250
providing such services, the school may pay for members of the 1251
faculty of the school to receive training in providing those 1252
services. The school principal or, in the school principal's 1253
discretion, appropriate school counselors shall determine any 1254
charitable organizations that the school hires to provide those 1255
services. The school shall ensure that any such charitable 1256
organization is exempt from federal income taxation under 1257
subsection 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code. The school 1258
shall not use the contributions it receives for any other 1259
purpose. 1260
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1261
receives pursuant to section 4503.956 of the Revised Code to the 1262
Liberty Center local school district, which shall use the 1263
contributions for its gifted programs and special education and 1264

S. B. No. 85 Page 44
As Passed by the Senate
related services. 1265
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1266
receives pursuant to section 4503.957 of the Revised Code to 1267
John F. Kennedy Catholic school located in Warren. The school 1268
shall not use the contributions it receives for any political 1269
purpose. 1270
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1271
receives pursuant to section 4503.958 of the Revised Code to 1272
Elder high school located in the municipal corporation of 1273
Cincinnati. The school shall use fifty per cent of the 1274
contributions it receives to provide tuition assistance to its 1275
students, twenty-five per cent of the contributions to benefit 1276
arts and enrichment at the school, and twenty-five per cent of 1277
the contributions to benefit athletics at the school. 1278
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1279
receives pursuant to section 4503.959 of the Revised Code to the 1280
Dublin food pantry, which shall use the contributions to provide 1281
food, hygiene products, and other resources to individuals and 1282
families experiencing food insecurity. 1283
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1284
receives pursuant to section 4503.961 of the Revised Code to 1285
Fairfield senior high school located in the municipal 1286
corporation of Fairfield. The high school shall not use the 1287
contributions for any political purpose. 1288
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1289
receives pursuant to section 4503.962 of the Revised Code to 1290
Hamilton high school located in the municipal corporation of 1291
Hamilton. The high school shall not use the contributions for 1292
any political purpose. 1293

S. B. No. 85 Page 45
As Passed by the Senate
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1294
receives pursuant to section 4503.963 of the Revised Code to 1295
Ross high school located in Ross township in Butler county. The 1296
high school shall not use the contributions for any political 1297
purpose. 1298
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1299
receives pursuant to section 4503.964 of the Revised Code to 1300
Chardon hilltopper gridiron club. The club shall use 1301
contributions to fund college and career technical training 1302
scholarships for students. 1303
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1304
receives pursuant to section 4503.965 of the Revised Code to the 1305
Norton music boosters association. The association shall use the 1306
contributions to provide financial assistance to the Norton high 1307
school music boosters for equipment, travel, and programming 1308
expenses. 1309
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1310
receives pursuant to section 4503.97 of the Revised Code to the 1311
friends of united Hatzalah of Israel, which shall use the money 1312
to support united Hatzalah of Israel, which provides free 1313
emergency medical first response throughout Israel. 1314
The registrar shall pay the contributions the registrar 1315
receives pursuant to section 4503.98 of the Revised Code to the 1316
Westerville parks foundation to support the programs and 1317
activities of the foundation and its mission of pursuing the 1318
city of Westerville's vision of becoming "A City Within A Park." 1319
(C) All investment earnings of the license plate 1320
contribution fund shall be credited to the fund. Not later than 1321
the first day of May of every year, the registrar shall 1322

S. B. No. 85 Page 46
As Passed by the Senate
distribute to each entity described in division (B) of this 1323
section the investment income the fund earned the previous 1324
calendar year. The amount of such a distribution paid to an 1325
entity shall be proportionate to the amount of money the entity 1326
received from the fund during the previous calendar year. 1327
Sec. 4503.589. (A) The owner or lessee of any passenger 1328
car, noncommercial motor vehicle, recreational vehicle, or other 1329
vehicle of a class approved by the registrar of motor vehicles 1330
may apply to the registrar for the registration of the vehicle 1331
and issuance of "Ohio NAACP" license plates. The application may 1332
be combined with a request for a special reserved license plate 1333
under section 4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code. Upon 1334
receipt of the completed application and compliance by the 1335
applicant with divisions (B) and (C) of this section, the 1336
registrar shall issue to the applicant the appropriate vehicle 1337
registration and a set of "Ohio NAACP" license plates and a 1338
validation sticker, or a validation sticker alone when required 1339
by section 4503.191 of the Revised Code. 1340
In addition to the letters and numbers ordinarily 1341
inscribed on the license plates, "Ohio NAACP" license plates 1342
shall display an appropriate logo and words that are selected by 1343
representatives of the Ohio conference of units of the national 1344
association for the advancement of colored people (NAACP) and 1345
approved by the registrar. "Ohio NAACP" license plates shall 1346
display county identification stickers that identify the county 1347
of registration as required under section 4503.19 of the Revised 1348
Code. 1349
(B) "Ohio NAACP" license plates and a validation sticker, 1350
or validation sticker alone, shall be issued upon receipt of an 1351
application for registration of a motor vehicle under this 1352

S. B. No. 85 Page 47
As Passed by the Senate
section; payment of the regular license tax as prescribed under 1353
section 4503.04 of the Revised Code, any applicable motor 1354
vehicle license tax levied under Chapter 4504. of the Revised 1355
Code, any applicable additional fee prescribed by section 1356
4503.40 or 4503.42 of the Revised Code, an additional 1357
administrative fee of ten dollars, and a contribution as 1358
provided in division (C)(1) of this section; and compliance with 1359
all other applicable laws relating to the registration of motor 1360
vehicles. 1361
(C)(1) For each application for registration and 1362
registration renewal notice the registrar receives under this 1363
section, the registrar shall collect a contribution of fifteen 1364
dollars. The registrar shall deposit this contribution into the 1365
state treasury to the credit of the license plate contribution 1366
fund created in section 4501.21 of the Revised Code. 1367
(2) The registrar shall deposit the administrative fee of 1368
ten dollars, the purpose of which is to compensate the bureau of 1369
motor vehicles for additional services required in the issuing 1370
of "Ohio NAACP" license plates, into the state treasury to the 1371
credit of the public safety - highway purposes fund created in 1372
section 4501.06 of the Revised Code. 1373
Section 2. That existing section 4501.21 of the Revised 1374
Code is hereby repealed. 1375
Section 3. Section 4501.21 of the Revised Code is 1376
presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended 1377
by both H.B. 315 and S.B. 163 of the 135th General Assembly. The 1378
General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) 1379
of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be 1380
harmonized if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, 1381
finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section 1382

S. B. No. 85 Page 48
As Passed by the Senate
in effect prior to the effective date of the section as 1383
presented in this act. 1384